Washington, session 2025-2026, HB2451.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:Sec. 1. RCW 39.114.010 and 2024 c 236 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.(1) "Assessed value of real property" means the valuation of taxable real property as placed on the last completed assessment roll prepared pursuant to Title 84 RCW.(2) "Consumer price index" means the consumer price index for all urban consumers in the west region as most recently published by the United States bureau of labor statistics.(3) "Increment area" means the geographic area within which regular property tax revenues are to be apportioned to pay public improvement costs, as authorized under this chapter.(((3)))(4) "Increment value" means 100 percent of any increase in the true and fair value of real property in an increment area that is placed on the tax rolls after the increment area takes effect. The increment value shall not be less than zero.(((4)))(5) "Local government" means any city, town, county, port district, or any combination thereof.(((5)))(6) "Ordinance" means any appropriate method of taking legislative action by a local government, including a resolution adopted by a port district organized under Title 53 RCW.(((6)))(7) "Public improvement costs" means the costs of:(a) Design, planning, acquisition, required permitting, required environmental studies and mitigation, seismic studies or surveys, archaeological studies or surveys, land surveying, site acquisition, including appurtenant rights and site preparation, construction, reconstruction, rehabilitation, improvement, expansion, and installation of public improvements, and other directly related costs;(b) Relocating, maintaining, and operating property pending construction of public improvements;(c) Relocating utilities as a result of public improvements;(d) Financing public improvements, including capitalized interest for up to six months following completion of construction, legal and other professional services, taxes, insurance, principal and interest costs on general indebtedness issued to finance public improvements, and any necessary debt service reserves;(e) Expenses incurred in revaluing real property for the purpose of determining the tax allocation base value by a county assessor under chapter 84.41 RCW and expenses incurred by a county treasurer under chapter 84.56 RCW in apportioning the taxes and complying with this chapter and other applicable law. For purposes of this subsection (((6)))(7)(e), "expenses incurred" means actual staff and software costs directly related to the implementation and ongoing administration of increment areas under this chapter;(f) Administrative expenses and feasibility studies reasonably necessary ((and related to these costs)), including related costs that may have been incurred before adoption of the ordinance authorizing the public improvements and the use of tax increment financing to fund the costs of the public improvements; and(g) Funding for interlocal agreements, revenue sharing agreements, and mitigation to impacted taxing districts as allowed in RCW 39.114.020.(((7)))(8) "Public improvements" means:(a) Infrastructure improvements owned by a state or local government within or outside of and serving the increment area and real property owned or acquired by a local government within the increment area including:(i) Street and road construction;(ii) Water and sewer system construction, expansion, and improvements;(iii) Sidewalks and other nonmotorized transportation improvements and streetlights;(iv) Parking, terminal, and dock facilities;(v) Park and ride facilities or other transit facilities;(vi) Park and community facilities and recreational areas;(vii) Stormwater and drainage management systems;(viii) Electric, broadband, or rail service;(ix) Mitigation of brownfields; ((or))(x) Fire, life, and public safety facilities and equipment; and(b) Expenditures for any of the following purposes:(i) Purchasing, rehabilitating, retrofitting for energy efficiency, and constructing housing for the purpose of creating or preserving long-term affordable housing;(ii) Purchasing, rehabilitating, retrofitting for energy efficiency, and constructing child care facilities serving children and youth that are low-income, homeless, or in foster care;(iii) Providing maintenance and security for the public improvements;(iv) Historic preservation activities authorized under RCW 35.21.395; or(v) Relocation ((and)), renovation, or construction of a government-owned facility((, with written permission from the agency owning the facility and the office of financial management)).(((8)))(9) "Real property" means:(a) Real property as defined in RCW 84.04.090; and(b) Privately owned or used improvements located on publicly owned land that are subject to property taxation or leasehold excise tax.(((9)))(10) "Regular property taxes" means regular property taxes as defined in RCW 84.04.140, except: (a) Regular property taxes levied by port districts or public utility districts to the extent necessary for the payments of principal and interest on general obligation debt; and (b) regular property taxes levied by the state for the support of the common schools under RCW 84.52.065. Regular property taxes do not include excess property tax levies that are exempt from the aggregate limits for junior and senior taxing districts as provided in RCW 84.52.043. "Regular property taxes" does not include excess property taxes levied by local school districts or emergency medical care and service taxes levied under RCW 84.52.069.(((10)))(11) "Tax allocation base value" means the assessed value of real property located within an increment area for taxes imposed in the year in which the increment area takes effect.(((11)))(12) "Tax allocation revenues" means those revenues derived from the imposition of regular property taxes on the increment value.(((12)))(13) "Taxing district" means a governmental entity that levies or has levied for it regular property taxes upon real property located within a proposed or approved increment area.Sec. 2. RCW 39.114.020 and 2025 c 417 s 1310 are each amended to read as follows:(1) A local government may designate an increment area under this chapter and use the tax allocation revenues to pay public improvement costs, subject to the following conditions:(a) The local government must adopt an ordinance designating an increment area within its boundaries and describing the public improvements proposed to be paid for, or financed with, tax allocation revenues;(b) The local government may not designate increment area boundaries such that the entirety of its territory falls within an increment area;(c)(i) Except as provided in (c)(ii) of this subsection, the increment area may not have an assessed valuation of more than $200,000,000 as adjusted annually by the consumer price index, beginning on June 1, 2027, or more than 20 percent of the sponsoring jurisdiction's total assessed valuation, whichever is less, when the ordinance is passed. If a sponsoring jurisdiction creates two increment areas, the total combined assessed valuation in both of the two increment areas may not equal more than $200,000,000 as adjusted annually by the consumer price index, beginning on June 1, 2027, or more than 20 percent of the sponsoring jurisdiction's total assessed valuation, whichever is less, when the ordinances are passed creating the increment areas.(ii) During the 2026 fiscal year, a sponsoring jurisdiction may enact a tax increment area or areas with a combined assessed valuation greater than $200,000,000 but no more than $500,000,000 if:(A) The sponsoring jurisdiction is a city with a population over 150,000 but less than 170,000 and is located in a county with a population of over 1,500,000;(B) The tax increment area is connected to Interstate 405 and the transportation-related public improvements that will be funded enhance the integration and connection of neighborhoods within and adjacent to the increment area;(C) The sponsoring jurisdiction enacted an ordinance designating the increment area no later than June 30, 2026; and(D) A governing body of any taxing district within the increment area approves by a majority vote, and according to the governing body's ordinance and publication procedures, the taxing district's partial or full participation in the tax increment project. If the governing body does not approve its participation, the taxing district's property taxes are not subject to apportionment under this chapter and the taxing district is excluded from the provisions of this section;(d) Except as otherwise provided in (c)(ii) of this subsection, a local government can create no more than two active increment areas at any given time ((and they)). Active increment areas may not physically overlap by including the same land in more than one increment area created by any local government at any time;(e) The ordinance must set a sunset date for the increment area, which ((may))must be the earlier of no more than 25 years after the first year in which tax allocation revenues are collected from the increment area or the date on which the obligations issued in reliance on the tax allocation revenues to finance the public improvements are no longer outstanding;(f) The ordinance must identify the public improvements to be financed and indicate whether the local government intends to issue bonds or other obligations, payable in whole or in part, from tax allocation revenues to finance the public improvement costs, and must estimate the maximum amount of obligations contemplated;(g) The ordinance must provide that the increment area takes effect on June 1st following the adoption of the ordinance in (a) of this subsection;(h) The sponsoring jurisdiction may not add additional public improvements to the project after adoption of the ordinance creating the increment area or change the boundaries of the increment area. The sponsoring jurisdiction may expand, alter, or add to the original public improvements when doing so is necessary to assure the originally approved improvements can be constructed or operated;(i) The ordinance must impose a deadline by which commencement of construction of the public improvements shall begin, which deadline must be ((at least))no more than five years into the future and for which extensions not to exceed two years shall be made available for good cause; ((and))(j) The local government must make a finding that:(i) The public improvements proposed to be paid or financed with tax allocation revenues are ((expected))necessary to encourage private development within the increment area and to increase the assessed value of real property within the increment area;(ii) Private development that is anticipated to occur within the increment area as a result of the proposed public improvements will be permitted consistent with the permitting jurisdiction's applicable zoning and development standards;(iii) The private development would not reasonably be expected to occur solely through private investment within the reasonably foreseeable future without the proposed public improvements; and(iv) The increased assessed value within the increment area that could reasonably be expected to occur without the proposed public improvements would be less than the increase in the assessed value estimated to result from the proposed development with the proposed public improvements; and(k) The ordinance may not include areas within an increment area that already have the necessary public improvements that are required for the private development expected to be made possible by the adoption of the increment area and may not include areas within an increment area where a private building or structure is under construction, has an active application for construction, has a valid permit for construction, or is undergoing a project-level environmental review process under chapter 43.21C RCW, unless the sponsoring jurisdiction can demonstrate that the public improvements developed in the increment area are necessary for the private development of projects that are seeking permit applications or under construction at the time the increment area is approved.(2) In considering whether to designate an increment area, the legislative body of the local government must prepare a project analysis that shall include, but need not be limited to, the following:(a) A statement of objectives of the local government for the designated increment area;(b) A statement as to the property within the increment area, if any, that the local government may intend to acquire;(c) The duration of the increment area;(d) Identification of all parcels to be included in the area;(e) A description of the expected private development within the increment area, including a comparison of scenarios with the proposed public improvements and without the proposed public improvements;(f) A ((description))list of the public improvements, including individual improvements in priority order with each improvement's nexus to encouraging private development, estimated completion date, estimated public improvement costs, proposed funding sources, and the estimated amount of bonds or other obligations expected to be issued to finance the public improvement costs and repaid with tax allocation revenues that can reasonably be expected to be completed within the first seven years of the project. The list should reflect the capital plans of the sponsoring jurisdiction and the reliance of those plans on investments by partners. When capital plans change, the sponsoring jurisdiction may reprioritize the list of public improvements. When the list is not reflected in the capital plans of the sponsoring jurisdiction, those public improvements shall be allowable only if the governing body makes a finding that the public improvements serve the goals and objectives of the capital plans;(g) The assessed value of real property listed on the tax roll as certified by the county assessor under RCW 84.52.080 from within the increment area and an estimate of the increment value and tax allocation revenues expected to be generated;(h) An estimate of the job creation reasonably expected to result from the public improvements and the private development expected to occur in the increment area;(i) An assessment of any impacts on the following:(i) Affordable and low-income housing;(ii) The local business community;(iii) The local school districts; and(iv) The ((local fire service, public hospital service, and emergency medical services))taxing districts; and(j) The assessment of impacts under (i) of this subsection (2) must be done in consultation with any impacted taxing district consistent with RCW 39.114.040 and include ((any)):(i) An estimate of the revenue impacts to each taxing district in the area, including tax allocation revenues, levy rate adjustments, and other revenues including, but not limited to, impact fees, fire benefit charges, sales tax, and utility tax, over the term of the increment area; and(ii) Any necessary mitigation to the ((local fire service, public hospital service, and emergency medical services; and(k) An assessment of any impacts of any other junior taxing districts not referenced in (i) of this subsection (2)))taxing districts.(3) The local government may charge a private developer, who agrees to participate in creating the increment area, a fee sufficient to cover the cost of the project analysis and establishing the increment area, including staff time, professionals and consultants, and other administrative costs related to establishing the increment area.(4) Nothing in this section prohibits a local government from entering into an agreement under chapter 39.34 RCW with another local government for the administration or other activities related to tax increment financing authorized under this section.(5)(a) If the project analysis indicates that an increment area will impact at least 20 percent of the assessed value in a public hospital district, fire protection district, or regional fire protection service authority, or if the public hospital district's or the fire service agency's annual report, or other governing board-adopted capital facilities plan, demonstrates an increase in the level of service directly related to the increased development in the increment area, the local government must enter into negotiations for a mitigation plan with the impacted public hospital district, fire protection district, or regional fire protection service authority to address level of service issues in the increment area.(b) If the parties cannot agree pursuant to (a) of this subsection (5), the parties must proceed to arbitration to determine the appropriate mitigation plan. The board of arbitrators must consist of three persons: One appointed by the local government seeking to designate the increment area and one appointed by the junior taxing district, both of whom must be appointed within 60 days of the date when arbitration is requested, and a third arbitrator who must be appointed by agreement of the other two arbitrators within 90 days of the date when arbitration is requested. If the two are unable to agree on the appointment of the third arbitrator within this 90-day period, then the third arbitrator must be appointed by a judge in the superior court of the county within which the largest portion of the increment area is located. The determination by the board of arbitrators is binding on both the local government seeking to impose the increment area and the junior taxing district.(6)(a) For increment areas that take effect after June 1, 2026, the local government designating the increment area and any impacted taxing district must begin negotiations to develop an agreement if such impacted taxing district, within 30 days of receiving the project analysis as required in subsection (8) of this section, indicates to the local government designating the increment area any of the following conditions:(i) The increment area will create an increase in residential development of at least 50 units or impact at least 10 percent of the assessed value in the impacted taxing district;(ii) The impacted taxing district can demonstrate or has forecasted an increase in the service demands directly related to the increased development in the increment area;(iii) The project analysis forecasts a loss of property tax revenue over the term of the increment area; or(iv) A taxing district is subject to more than one tax increment area and the proposed increment area will result in more than 20 percent of the taxing district's assessed value being subject to tax increment areas.(b) If voters in the impacted taxing district elect to authorize an increase in regular property tax levies under RCW 84.55.050, the impacted taxing district and the local government designating an increment area must review the agreement and address impacts related to the levy lid lift. Either party may initiate a review of any agreement no more frequently than every five years. Subsequent revisions of an agreement are not subject to arbitration.(c) If the parties cannot agree to a final agreement pursuant to (a) of this subsection (6), the parties must proceed to mediation within 30 days of the end of the notice and consultation period in RCW 39.114.040 to further attempt to reach an agreement.(d) If, after 30 days, the parties cannot agree in mediation, the parties must proceed to arbitration within 90 days of the end of the notice and consultation period in RCW 39.114.040 to determine the appropriate mitigation plan. The board of arbitrators must consist of three persons: One appointed by the local government seeking to designate the increment area and one appointed by the impacted taxing district, both of whom must be appointed within 30 days of the date when arbitration is requested, and a third arbitrator who must be appointed by agreement of the other two arbitrators within 30 days of the date when arbitration is requested. If the two are unable to agree on the appointment of the third arbitrator within this 60-day period, then the third arbitrator must be appointed by a judge in the superior court of the county within which the largest portion of the increment area is located. The determination by the board of arbitrators is binding on both the local government seeking to impose the increment area and the impacted taxing district. In making a determination, the board of arbitrators must consider:(i) Whether new service demands will be created directly by the new development in the increment area that are not funded by the corresponding revenue generated by the new development;(ii) Whether the impacted taxing district will experience a loss of property tax revenue beyond the base level and has taken steps to address impacts to property tax revenues as allowed under RCW 84.55.010;(iii) How the increment area may impact taxpayers outside of the increment area;(iv) Other revenues generated for the impacted taxing district in the increment area; and(v) The overall 25-year impact of the increment area on the impacted taxing district, including the broader economic impacts of the development.(e) Mitigation may include reductions or suspensions in the percentage or term of tax allocation revenues transferred to the local government designating the increment area, the use of tax allocation revenues to fund public improvements to serve the projected development in the increment area, and other provisions designed to mitigate the impacts on taxing districts. Mitigation may not include allowing a taxing district to opt out or be removed from participation in the tax allocation and increment area. Any decision must be consistent with the uniformity requirement of Article VII, section 1 of the state Constitution.(7) The local government ((may))must reimburse the assessor and treasurer for their costs as provided in RCW 39.114.010(((6)))(7)(e).(((7)))(8) Prior to the adoption of an ordinance authorizing creation of an increment area, the local government must:(a) Hold at least two public ((briefings))hearings for the community solely on the tax increment project that include the description of the increment area, the public improvements proposed to be financed with the tax allocation revenues, and a detailed estimate of tax revenues for the participating local governments and taxing districts, including the amounts allocated to the ((increment)) public improvements. The ((briefings))hearings must be announced at least two weeks prior to the date being held, including publishing in a legal newspaper of general circulation and posting information on the local government website and all local government social media sites, and must occur no earlier than 90 days after submitting the project analysis to the office of the state treasurer and all local governments and taxing districts impacted by the increment area;(b) Submit the project analysis to all local governments and taxing districts impacted by the increment ((area no less than 90 days prior to the adoption of the ordinance))at the same time as submitting the analysis to the office of the treasurer; and(c) Submit the project analysis to the office of the treasurer for review and consider any comments that the treasurer may provide upon completion of their review of the project analysis as provided under this subsection. The treasurer must complete the review within 90 days of receipt of the project analysis, may receive comments from taxing districts, and may consult with other agencies and outside experts as necessary. Upon completing their review, the treasurer must promptly provide to the local government, and any taxing district that submitted comments, any comments regarding suggested revisions or enhancements to the project analysis that the treasurer deems appropriate based on the requirements in subsection (2) of this section.Sec. 3. RCW 39.114.030 and 2021 c 207 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Public improvements that are financed under this chapter may be undertaken and coordinated with other programs or efforts undertaken by the local government and other taxing districts and may be funded in part from revenue sources other than tax allocation revenues.(2) Public improvements that are constructed by a private developer must meet all applicable state and local laws.(3) A private developer may construct public improvements and receive payment from tax allocation revenues received by the local government as part of a reimbursement agreement between the parties. Any reimbursement paid to the developer may be secured by tax allocation revenues received by the local government.Sec. 4. RCW 39.114.040 and 2024 c 236 s 3 are each amended to read as follows:The local government designating the increment area must:(1) Provide written notice to the governing body of each taxing district within which the increment area is located a minimum of ((90))180 days before submitting the project analysis to the office of the state treasurer as required in RCW 39.114.020(((7)))(8)(c) and offer to consult with the affected taxing district within 30 days for the purpose of discussing the proposed increment area and the development of the project analysis, including revenue and mitigation impacts;(2) Publish notice in a legal newspaper of general circulation within the jurisdiction of the local government at least two weeks before the date on which the ordinance authorizing creation of an increment area is adopted that describes the public improvements, describes the boundaries of the increment area, and identifies the location and times where the ordinance and other public information concerning the public improvement may be inspected; ((and))(3) Deliver a certified copy of the adopted ordinance to the county treasurer, the county assessor, and the governing body of each taxing district within which the increment area is located at the respective addresses specified pursuant to RCW 42.56.040 within 10 days of the date on which the ordinance was adopted; and(4)(a) Prepare and make available to the residents of all impacted taxing jurisdictions an annual report on the status of the increment area, including:(i) Progress on construction of public improvements funded by the increment value;(ii) The economic benefits created in the increment area;(iii) The status of mitigation to impacted taxing districts;(iv) How the increment area has impacted tax revenues and rates in the impacted taxing districts; and(b) Request and include in its annual report any statements provided by impacted taxing districts.Sec. 5. RCW 39.114.050 and 2023 c 354 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:Apportionment of taxes shall be as follows:(1) Commencing in the calendar year immediately following the calendar year in which the increment area takes effect in accordance with RCW 39.114.020, the county treasurer shall distribute receipts from regular property taxes imposed on real property located in the increment area as follows:(a) Each taxing district shall receive that portion of its regular property taxes produced by the rate of tax levied by or for the taxing district on the tax allocation base value for that increment area;(i) This apportionment does not interfere with the calculation and implementation of a taxing district's highest allowable levy per RCW 84.55.010 subject to action by its governing body;(ii) If the voters of a taxing district subsequently approve an increase in regular property tax levies under RCW 84.55.050, the tax allocation base value used to calculate the apportionment applicable to that taxing district must be increased in the year following the voter approval by an amount equal to (A) the incremental increase in the levy rate approved by the voters, multiplied by (B) the total assessed value within the district for that year. For this purpose, the incremental increase in the levy rate means the difference between the maximum voter-approved levy rates set forth in the ballot measure and the maximum levy rate that would have been available for that year but for the voter approval of the ballot measure;(iii) The amount of the increased tax allocation base value calculated in (a)(ii) of this subsection shall remain fixed at that increased level for so long as the voter authorization for the increased levy remains in effect, in accordance with the ballot proposition. Upon expiration of the voter authorization, the tax allocation base value for that district must be recalculated as if the ballot proposition had not been approved;(b) The local government that designated the increment area shall be entitled to receive an additional amount equal to the amount derived from the regular property taxes levied by or for each taxing district upon the increment value within the increment area. The local government that designated the increment area shall receive no more than is needed to pay or repay costs directly associated with the public improvements identified in the approved ordinance and may agree to receive less than the full amount of this portion, as long as bond debt service, reserve, and other bond covenant requirements are satisfied, in which case the balance of these tax receipts shall be allocated to the taxing districts that imposed regular property taxes, or have regular property taxes imposed for them, in the increment area for collection that year in proportion to their regular tax levy rates for collection that year. The local government may request that the treasurer transfer this additional portion of the property taxes to its designated agent. The portion of the tax receipts distributed to the local government or its agent under this subsection (1)(b) may only be expended to finance public improvement costs associated with the public improvements financed in whole or in part by tax increment financing; and(c) This section shall not apply to any receipts from the regular property taxes levied by:(i) The state for the support of the common schools under RCW 84.52.065;(ii) Local school district excess levies and emergency medical care and service levies under RCW 84.52.069; and(iii) Port districts or public utility districts specifically for the purpose of making required payments of principal and interest or general indebtedness.(2) The apportionment of tax allocation revenues must cease when the taxing district certifies to the county assessor in writing that tax allocation revenues are no longer necessary or obligated to pay public improvement costs, but in no event shall the apportionment of tax allocation revenues continue beyond the sunset date established pursuant to RCW 39.114.020(1)(e). Any excess tax allocation revenues and earnings on the tax allocation revenues remaining at the time the apportionment of tax receipts terminates must be returned to the county treasurer and distributed to the taxing districts that imposed regular property taxes, or had regular property taxes imposed for it, in the increment area for collection that year, in proportion to the rates of their regular property tax levies for collection that year.(3) The apportionment and distribution of portions of the regular property taxes levied by or for each taxing district upon the increment value within the increment area pursuant to and subject to the requirements of this chapter is declared to be a public purpose of and benefit each such taxing district.(4) The apportionment and distribution of portions of the regular property taxes levied by or for each taxing district upon the increment value within the increment area pursuant to this section shall not affect or be deemed to affect the rate of taxes levied by or within any such taxing district or the consistency of any such levies with the uniformity requirement of Article VII, section 1 of the state Constitution.(5)(a) For a local government having a designated increment area under this chapter as of May 9, 2023, the county assessor must adjust the tax allocation base value for that increment area to include the assessed value of any privately owned improvements located on publicly owned land for taxes imposed in the year in which the increment area was first designated. However, no adjustment is required if the increment area does not include any privately owned improvements located on publicly owned land subject to property taxation as of the date the increment area became effective.(b) The adjusted tax allocation base value under this subsection (5) does not impact any apportionment and distribution under this section occurring in calendar years before calendar year 2024.Sec. 6. RCW 84.14.020 and 2025 c 267 s 13 and 2025 c 164 s 2 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:(1)(a) The value of new housing construction, conversion, and rehabilitation improvements qualifying under this chapter is exempt from ad valorem property taxation, as follows:(i) For properties for which applications for certificates of tax exemption eligibility are submitted under this chapter before July 22, 2007, the value is exempt for 10 successive years beginning January 1st of the year immediately following the calendar year of issuance of the certificate;(ii) For properties for which applications for certificates of tax exemption eligibility are submitted under this chapter on or after July 22, 2007, the value is exempt:(A) For eight successive years beginning January 1st of the year immediately following the calendar year of issuance of the certificate;(B) For 12 successive years beginning January 1st of the year immediately following the calendar year of issuance of the certificate, if the property otherwise qualifies for the exemption under this chapter and meets the conditions in this subsection (1)(a)(ii)(B). For the property to qualify for the 12-year exemption under this subsection, the applicant must commit to renting or selling at least 20 percent of the multifamily housing units as affordable housing units to either low-income or moderate-income households, or both, and the property must satisfy that commitment and any additional affordability and income eligibility conditions adopted by the local government under this chapter. In the case of projects intended exclusively for owner occupancy, the local government must require the applicant to record a covenant or deed restriction that ensures the affordability requirements and other conditions of the exemption are met, and the minimum requirement of this subsection (1)(a)(ii)(B) may be satisfied solely through housing affordable to moderate-income households;(C) For 20 successive years beginning January 1st of the year immediately following the calendar year of issuance of the certificate, if the property otherwise qualifies for the exemption under this chapter and meets the conditions in this subsection (1)(a)(ii)(C). For the property to qualify for the 20-year exemption under this subsection, the project must be located within one mile of high capacity transit of at least 15 minute scheduled frequency, in a city that has implemented a mandatory inclusionary zoning requirement for affordable housing that ensures affordability of housing units for a period of at least 99 years and that has a population of at least 15,000. To qualify for the exemption provided in this subsection (1)(a)(ii)(C), the applicant must commit to renting at least 20 percent of the dwelling units as affordable to low-income households for a term of at least 99 years, and the property must satisfy that commitment and all required affordability and income eligibility conditions adopted by the local government under this chapter. A city must require the applicant to record a covenant or deed restriction that ensures the continuing rental of units subject to these affordability requirements consistent with the conditions in this subsection (1)(a)(ii)(C) for a period of no less than 99 years. The covenant or deed restriction must also address criteria and policies to maintain public benefit if the property is converted to a use other than which continues to provide for permanently affordable low-income housing consistent with this subsection (1)(a)(ii)(C). This exemption does not apply in tax increment financing areas in effect prior to June 2, 2026; or(D) For 20 successive years beginning January 1st of the year immediately following the calendar year of issuance of the certificate, if the property is located fully or partially with [within] a station area of a city and meets the affordability requirements in RCW 36.70A.840(7)(a). A county may approve an exemption under this subsection for multifamily residential housing within a station area if the property otherwise qualifies for the exemption under this chapter and meets the density requirements in RCW 36.70A.840(2)(a) and affordability requirements in RCW 36.70A.840(7)(a). A city or county must require the applicant to record a covenant or deed restriction that ensures the continuing rental or ownership of units subject to the affordability requirements in RCW 36.70A.840(7)(a) for a period of no less than 50 years. The covenant or deed restriction must also address criteria and policies to maintain public benefit if the property is converted to a use other than one which continues to provide for permanently affordable low-income housing consistent with RCW 36.70A.840(7)(a). This exemption does not apply in tax increment financing areas in effect prior to June 2, 2026; and(iii) Until December 31, 2026, for a city as defined in RCW 84.14.010(3)(d), for 12 successive years beginning January 1st of the year immediately following the calendar year of issuance of the certificate, if the property otherwise qualifies for the exemption under this chapter and meets the conditions in this subsection (1)(a)(iii). For the property to qualify for the 12-year exemption under this subsection, the applicant must commit to renting or selling at least 20 percent of the multifamily housing units as affordable housing units to either low-income or moderate-income households, or both, the property must satisfy that commitment and any additional affordability and income eligibility conditions adopted by the local government under this chapter, and the area must be zoned to have an average minimum density equivalent to 15 dwelling units or more per gross acre. In the case of projects intended exclusively for owner occupancy, the minimum requirement of this subsection (1)(a)(iii) may be satisfied solely through housing affordable to either low-income or moderate-income households, or both.(b) The exemptions provided in (a)(i) through (iii) of this subsection do not include the value of land or nonhousing-related improvements not qualifying under this chapter.(c) For properties receiving an exemption as provided in (a)(ii)(B) of this subsection that are in compliance with existing contracts and where the certificate of tax exemption is set to expire after June 11, 2020, but before December 31, 2021, the exemption is extended until December 31, 2021, provided that the property must satisfy any eligibility criteria or limitations provided in this chapter as a condition to the existing exemption for a given property continue to be met. For all properties eligible to receive an extension pursuant to this subsection (1)(c), the city or county that issued the initial certificate of tax exemption, as required in RCW 84.14.090, must notify the county assessor and the applicant of the extension of the certificate of tax exemption.(d) A county subject to the criteria for a residential targeted area in RCW 84.14.040(1)(d)(ii) may not approve a certificate of tax exemption eligibility for the eight-year exemption authorized under (a)(ii)(A) of this subsection (1).(2) When a local government adopts guidelines pursuant to RCW 84.14.030(2) and includes conditions that must be satisfied with respect to individual dwelling units, rather than with respect to the multiple-unit housing as a whole or some minimum portion thereof, the exemption may, at the local government's discretion, be limited to the value of the qualifying improvements allocable to those dwelling units that meet the local guidelines.(3) In the case of rehabilitation of existing buildings, the exemption does not include the value of improvements constructed prior to the submission of the application required under this chapter. The incentive provided by this chapter is in addition to any other incentives, tax credits, grants, or other incentives provided by law.(4) This chapter does not apply to increases in assessed valuation made by the assessor on nonqualifying portions of building and value of land nor to increases made by lawful order of a county board of equalization, the department of revenue, or a county, to a class of property throughout the county or specific area of the county to achieve the uniformity of assessment or appraisal required by law.(5) At the conclusion of the exemption period, the value of the new housing construction, conversion, or rehabilitation improvements must be considered as new construction for the purposes of chapters 84.55 and 36.21 RCW as though the property was not exempt under this chapter.(6) For properties that qualified for, satisfied the conditions of, and utilized the exemption under subsection (1)(a)(ii)(A) or (B) of this section, following the initial exemption period or the extension period authorized in subsection (1)(c) of this section, the exemption period may be extended for an additional 12 years for projects that are within 18 months of expiration contingent on city or county approval. For the property to qualify for an extension under this subsection (6), the applicant must meet at a minimum the locally adopted requirements for the property to qualify for an exemption under subsection (1)(a)(ii)(B) of this section as applicable at the time of the extension application, and the applicant commits to renting or selling at least 20 percent of the multifamily housing units as affordable housing units for low-income households.(7) At the end of both the 10th and 11th years of an extension, for 12-year extensions of the exemption, applicants must provide tenants of rent-restricted units with notification of intent to provide the tenant with rental relocation assistance as provided in subsection (8) of this section.(8)(a) Except as provided in (b) of this subsection, for any 12-year exemption authorized under subsection (1)(a)(ii)(B) or (iii) of this section after July 25, 2021, or for any 12-year exemption extension authorized under subsection (6) of this section, at the expiration of the exemption the applicant must provide tenant relocation assistance in an amount equal to one month's rent to a qualified tenant within the final month of the qualified tenant's lease. To be eligible for tenant relocation assistance under this subsection, the tenant must occupy an income-restricted unit at the time the exemption expires and must qualify as a low-income household under this chapter at the time relocation assistance is sought.(b) If affordability requirements consistent, at a minimum, with those required under subsection (1)(a)(ii)(B) or (iii) of this section remain in place for the unit after the expiration of the exemption, relocation assistance in an amount equal to one month's rent must be provided to a qualified tenant within the final month of a qualified tenant's lease who occupies an income-restricted unit at the time those additional affordability requirements cease to apply to the unit.(9) For compliance with the affordability requirements of subsection (1)(a)(ii)(B) or (C) or (a)(iii) of this section, a low-income or moderate-income household that initially qualifies for an income-restricted rental unit may continue to qualify as low-income or moderate-income until their adjusted household income exceeds 150 percent of the established income limit.(10) No new exemptions may be provided under this section beginning on or after January 1, 2032. No extensions may be granted under subsection (6) of this section on or after January 1, 2046.Sec. 7. RCW 39.89.020 and 2022 c 38 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.(1) "Assessed value of real property" means the valuation of real property as placed on the last completed assessment roll.(2) "Increment area" means the geographic area from which taxes are to be appropriated to finance public improvements authorized under this chapter.(3) "Increment value" means 75 percent of any increase in the true and fair value of real property in an increment area that is placed on the tax rolls after the increment area is created.(4) "Local government" means any city, town, county, port district, or any combination thereof.(5) "Ordinance" means any appropriate method of taking legislative action by a local government.(6) "Permanently affordable housing" means housing, regardless of ownership, for which there is a legally binding, recorded document in effect that limits the price at which the owner may sell or restricts the occupancy of the unit to a qualified, low-income household, for a period of at least 40 years for a property used for shelter or rental housing, or for a period of at least 25 years for a property to be owned by a low-income household. These documents include, but are not limited to, affordability covenants, deed restrictions, and community land trust leases. Resale restrictions exercised by providers of permanently affordable housing can include, but are not limited to:(a) Continuous ownership of land by a public entity or nonprofit housing provider with a lease allowing ownership of the structure by an income-eligible household;(b) A nonpossessory interest or right in real property, such as a deed restriction, restrictive covenant, resale restriction, or other contractual agreement, that ensures affordability.(7) "Public improvement costs" means the costs of: (a) Design, planning, acquisition, site preparation, construction, reconstruction, rehabilitation, improvement, and installation of public improvements; (b) purchasing, rehabilitating, retrofitting for energy efficiency, and constructing housing for the purpose of creating or preserving permanently affordable housing; (c) relocating, maintaining, and operating property pending construction of public improvements; (d) relocating utilities as a result of public improvements; (e) financing public improvements, including interest during construction, legal and other professional services, taxes, insurance, principal and interest costs on general indebtedness issued to finance public improvements, and any necessary reserves for general indebtedness; (f) assessments incurred in revaluing real property for the purpose of determining the tax allocation base value that are in excess of costs incurred by the assessor in accordance with the revaluation plan under chapter 84.41 RCW, and the costs of apportioning the taxes and complying with this chapter and other applicable law; and (g) administrative expenses and feasibility studies reasonably necessary and related to these costs, including related costs that may have been incurred before adoption of the ordinance authorizing the public improvements and the use of community revitalization financing to fund the costs of the public improvements.(8) "Public improvements" means:(a) Infrastructure improvements within the increment area that include:(i) Street and road construction and maintenance;(ii) Water and sewer system construction and improvements;(iii) Sidewalks and streetlights;(iv) Parking, terminal, and dock facilities;(v) Park and ride facilities of a transit authority;(vi) Park facilities and recreational areas;(vii) Stormwater and drainage management systems; ((and))(viii) Permanently affordable housing; and(ix) Public safety facilities; and(b) Expenditures for any of the following purposes:(i) Providing environmental analysis, professional management, planning, and promotion within the increment area, including the management and promotion of retail trade activities in the increment area;(ii) Providing maintenance and security for common or public areas in the increment area; or(iii) Historic preservation activities authorized under RCW 35.21.395.(9) "Regular property taxes" means regular property taxes as defined in RCW 84.04.140, except: (a) Regular property taxes levied by port districts or public utility districts specifically for the purpose of making required payments of principal and interest on general indebtedness; and (b) regular property taxes levied by the state for the support of the common schools under RCW 84.52.065. Regular property taxes do not include excess property tax levies that are exempt from the aggregate limits for junior and senior taxing districts as provided in RCW 84.52.043.(10) "Tax allocation base value" means the true and fair value of real property located within an increment area for taxes imposed in the year in which the increment area is created, plus 25 percent of any increase in the true and fair value of real property located within an increment area that is placed on the assessment rolls after the increment area is created.(11) "Tax allocation revenues" means those tax revenues derived from the imposition of regular property taxes on the increment value and distributed to finance public improvements.(12) "Taxing districts" means a governmental entity that levies or has levied for it regular property taxes upon real property located within a proposed or approved increment area.(13) "Value of taxable property" means the value of the taxable property as defined in RCW 39.36.015.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 8. The provisions of this act do not modify or otherwise impact increment areas in place prior to June 2, 2026.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 9. This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect June 2, 2026.--- END ---